Hawaii statutes.
§11-337 Reporting expenditures. (a)
For purposes of this part, an expenditure is deemed to be made or incurred when
the services are rendered or the product is delivered. Services rendered or
products delivered for use during a reporting period are deemed delivered or
rendered during the period or periods of use; provided that these expenditures
shall be reasonably allocated between periods in accordance with the time the
services or products are actually used.

(b) Any expenditure that is contracted or paid
for and that is to be rendered during the last three days prior to an election
shall be included in a late expenditure report as provided in section 11-338.
[L 2010, c 211, pt of §2; am L 2013, c 112, §6]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next